Arkansas, session 2025, HB1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 88, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 15 — Governing Unaccredited Representatives Defrauding (GUARD) VA
Benefits Act

4-88-1501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Governing
Unaccredited Representatives Defrauding (GUARD) VA Benefits Act".

4-88-1502. Purpose.
*ZRC043*
02/05/2025 4:55:41 PM ZRC043

HB1423
The purpose of this subchapter is to provide a cause of action under
the laws of this state to prevent unethical conduct and the improper
collection of fees by persons advising or assisting an individual with the
filing of a claim for disability benefits before the Department of Veterans
Affairs or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

4-88-1503. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Compensation" means payment of money, a thing of value, or
a financial benefit;
(2) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, public
corporation, or any other legal or for profit commercial entity; and
(3) "Veterans' benefits matter" means the preparation,
presentation, or prosecution of a claim affecting a person who has filed or
expressed an intent to file a claim for a benefit, program, service,
commodity, function, or status, the entitlement to which is determined under
the laws and regulations administered by the Department of Veterans Affairs
or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs pertaining to veterans,
their dependents, their survivors, and any other individual eligible for such
benefits.

4-88-1504. Advising or assisting in veterans' benefits matters —
Receipt of compensation.
(a)(1) A person may not receive compensation for the preparation,
presentation, or prosecution of a claim or for advising, consulting, or
assisting an individual with regard to a veterans' benefits matter before the
Department of Veterans Affairs or the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, except as permitted under Title 38 U.S.C. § 5904, and 38 C.F.R. §
14.629.
(2) A person may not receive compensation for referring an
individual to another person to prepare, present, or prosecute a claim or
advise, consult, or assist the individual with a veterans' benefits matter
before the Department of Veterans Affairs or the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs.
(3) Except as provided under subdivision (a)(1) of this section,
02/05/2025 4:55:41 PM ZRC043

HB1423
this subsection does not prohibit a division of fees between attorneys that
is otherwise proper under the American Bar Association's Model Rules of
Professional Conduct, Rule 1.5(e).
(b) A person who receives compensation for the preparation,
presentation, or prosecution of a claim or for advising, consulting, or
assisting an individual with regard to a veterans' benefits matter before the
Department of Veterans Affairs or the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs shall be held to the same ethical standards to which an attorney is
held under the Arkansas Rules of Professional Conduct, including without
limitation the rules on:
(1) Advertising;
(2) Solicitation of new clients; and
(3) Confidentiality.
(c) A violation of this section is a deceptive and unfair trade
practice and constitutes a Class A misdemeanor as a violation of the
Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.




















02/05/2025 4:55:41 PM ZRC043